District of Columbia statutes.
3-901

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-107, § 2, 25 DCR 1391
July 23, 1992, D.C. Law 9-134, § 301(b)(1), 39 DCR 4066
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 301(b)(1), 39 DCR 4895
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 514, 60 DCR 3390
1981 Ed., § 2-1101.
1973 Ed., § 2-2501.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 301(b)(1) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-134, July 23, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 5815).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).

The “Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 ( 42 U.S.C. § 3701),” referred to in paragraph (2), was repealed by Title II, § 602 of the Act of October 12, 1984, 98 Stat. 2077, Pub. L. 98-473.

“Section 203(c) of the Crime Control Act of 1976 ( 42 U.S.C. § 3723),” referred to in paragraph (3), was superseded by Pub. L. 90-351, Title I, § 203, as added December 27, 1979, 93 Stat. 1174, Pub. L. 96-157, § 2.

Designation of a Single State Agency to Administer the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency and Establishment of the Juvenile Justice Advisory Group, see Mayor’s Order 2009-13, February 9, 2009 ( 56 DCR 2033).
Application of § 301 of Law 9-145: Section 501(c)(3) of D.C. Law 9-145 provided that § 301 shall apply as of October 1, 1992.